Massachusetts, session 194th, H165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of Chapter 94G of the General Laws is amended by inserting, at the end of the
section, the following subsection:
(m) The commission shall convene a sustainability working group and will meet with
representatives from the cannabis industry in the commonwealth to discuss measures that will
increase sustainable practices and reduce the use of natural materials in the cannabis industry.
The working group will address issues including, but not limited to:
(i) how cannabis cultivators, wholesalers, and the commonwealth may cooperate on a
system of recollecting, sanitizing, and reusing returned packages for consumer use
(ii) the development of a manual of best practices that the CCC will issue to standardize
regulations and recommendations around the legal disposal of marijuana waste and recollection
of packages
of 2

(iii) the development of a recollection and reuse program for radio frequency
identification tags used for seed-to-sale tracking.
of 2